Massachusetts, session 194th, S1971.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 64D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following after the words “after two dollars”
as it appears the second time and before the word “provided”:-
“hereafter referred to as the existing rate”.
And in said section, after the words “two dollars” and before the word
“Notwithstanding” the following words:-
however, for sales exceeding $250,000 but less than $500,000, 1.1 multiplied by the
existing rate; for sales exceeding $500,000 but less than $1,000,000, 1.6 multiplied by the
existing rate, for sales exceeding $1,000,000 but less than $2,000,000 1.8 multiplied by the
existing rate; for sales exceeding $2,000,000 the existing rate multiplied by 2.
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of chapter 64D is hereby further amended by inserting after
the words "or the United States or any of their agencies are a party." the following words:-
of 2

"The Executive Office of Housing and Livable Communities shall equally divide such
tax revenue to initiatives to address the housing crisis and to fund the Affordable Housing Act
initiatives as established in chapter 150 of the Acts of 2024."
of 2